Hawaii, session 2025, GM1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 486J-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"S486J-5.5 Energy data collection program. The department
shall establish the energy data collection program that includes
development and maintenance of an energy database system that
meets the requirements of government and industry, while
promoting sound policy making, greenhouse gas emission inventory
reporting, energy planning, energy assurance planning, [and]
energy security[—], critical infrastructure protection, and
emergency management, response, and recovery."
SECTION 2. Section 486J-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, with respect to
data that the commission or department obtained or was provided
pursuant to this chapter, neither the commission or department
nor any employee of the commission or department may do any of
the following:
BED-34(25)

Page 2
S.B. NO. /3W
(1) Use the information furnished or obtained for any
purpose other than the purposes for which it is
supplied;
(2) Make any publication whereby the data furnished by any
person can be identified; or
(3) Permit any person other than the commission, the
department of taxation, the attorney general, the
consumer advocate, the department of business,
economic development, and tourism, the department of
hea1th, the Hawaii emergency management agency, the
office of homeland security, and the authorized
representatives and employees of each to examine the
individual reports or statements provided."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4, This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY:
BY REQUEST
BED-34(25)

S.B. NO. 1341
APPROVED this 10th day of April , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI’I

S.B.No. 1341
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: February 28, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: MAR 2 7 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2025.
Speaker, House of Representatives
Clerk, House of Representatives
791